Maryland, session 2026, HB1562.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xlvii) Title 14, Subtitle 50 of this article; [or]
(xlviii) Section 13–411.1(c)(2) of the Transportation Article; or
(XLIX) TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 51 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
SUBTITLE 51. AUTOMATIC TELECOMMUNICATIONS SERVICE OUTAGE CREDIT
ACT.
14–5101.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “COMMERCIAL TELECOMMUNICATIONS SERVICE PROVIDER” MEANS A
PERSON WHO IS A PROVIDER OF TELECOMMUNICATIONS SERVICES, AS DEFINED IN
47 U.S.C. § 153, TO RETAIL CONSUMERS IN THE STATE.
(C) “MATERIAL SERVICE OUTAGE” MEANS A DISRUPTION OR
UNAVAILABILITY OF A COMMERCIAL TELECOMMUNICATIONS SERVICE PROVIDER’S
WIRELESS VOICE, TEXT, OR DATA SERVICE THAT:
(1) LASTS AT LEAST 3 CONSECUTIVE HOURS; AND
(2) AFFECTS A CUSTOMER’S ABILITY TO ACCESS WIRELESS SERVICE
AT THE CUSTOMER’S PRIMARY SERVICE LOCATION OR WITHIN THE PROVIDER’S
COVERED SERVICE AREA.
(D) “SERVICE DISRUPTION CREDIT” MEANS A BILLING ADJUSTMENT OR
CREDIT APPLIED TO A CUSTOMER’S ACCOUNT TO COMPENSATE FOR A MATERIAL
SERVICE OUTAGE.
14–5102.

HOUSE BILL 1562 3
(A) A COMMERCIAL TELECOMMUNICATIONS SERVICE PROVIDER THAT
EXPERIENCES A MATERIAL SERVICE OUTAGE SHALL AUTOMATICALLY APPLY A
SERVICE DISRUPTION CREDIT TO THE ACCOUNT OF EACH CUSTOMER AFFECTED BY
THE MATERIAL SERVICE OUTAGE.
(B) THE SERVICE DISRUPTION CREDIT REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION
SHALL BE APPLIED:
(1) WITHOUT REQUIRING ANY CUSTOMER ACTION; AND
(2) TO THE CUSTOMER’S NEXT BILLING STATEMENT OR, IF NOT
PRACTICABLE, NOT LATER THAN THE SECOND BILLING CYCLE IMMEDIATELY
FOLLOWING RESTORATION OF SERVICE.
(C) THE MINIMUM SERVICE DISRUPTION CREDIT REQUIRED UNDER THIS
SECTION FOR EACH MATERIAL SERVICE OUTAGE SHALL BE NOT LESS THAN A
PRORATED AMOUNT THAT IS EQUIVALENT TO 1 FULL DAY OF THE CUSTOMER’S
RECURRING MONTHLY SERVICE CHARGE.
(D) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO:
(1) REGULATE TELECOMMUNICATIONS SERVICE RATES OR PRICING
STRUCTURES; OR
(2) PREVENT A COMMERCIAL TELECOMMUNICATIONS SERVICE
PROVIDER FROM PROVIDING A SERVICE DISRUPTION CREDIT THAT IS GREATER
THAN THE AMOUNT REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
14–5103.
(A) A COMMERCIAL TELECOMMUNICATIONS SERVICE PROVIDER SHALL
PROVIDE REASONABLE NOTICE TO AFFECTED CUSTOMERS OF:
(1) THE OCCURRENCE OF A MATERIAL SERVICE OUTAGE;
(2) THE ESTIMATED DURATION OF THE OUTAGE, IF KNOWN; AND
(3) THE AUTOMATIC APPLICATION OF A SERVICE DISRUPTION
CREDIT.
(B) THE NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION MAY
BE PROVIDED BY TEXT MESSAGE, BY E–MAIL, THROUGH AN APPLICATION ON A

HOUSE BILL 1562
MOBILE DEVICE, OR BY POSTING ON THE COMMERCIAL TELECOMMUNICATIONS
SERVICE PROVIDER’S PUBLIC WEBSITE.
14–5104.
A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE IS:
(1) AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE WITHIN
THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY PROVISIONS
CONTAINED IN TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE.
14–5105.
THIS SUBTITLE MAY BE CITED AS THE AUTOMATIC TELECOMMUNICATIONS
SERVICE OUTAGE CREDIT ACT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.